Malayalam.lexc
! Malayalam Morphology Lexicon
Multichar_Symbols
    +N        ! Noun
    +Adj      ! Adjective
    +V        ! Verb
    +Sg       ! Singular
    +Pl       ! Plural
    +Nom      ! Nominative
    +Gen      ! Genitive
    +Pres     ! Present tense
    +Past     ! Past tense
    +Fut      ! Future tense
    +Pred     ! Predicative form (adjective)
    +Comp     ! Comparative form (adjective)

LEXICON Root
    Nouns ;
    Adjectives ;
    Verbs ;

! --- 4 noun stems ---
LEXICON Nouns
    kutti      N_Infl ;   ! child
    maram      N_Infl ;   ! tree
    pustakam   N_Infl ;   ! book
    veedu      N_Infl ;   ! house

! --- 3 adjective stems ---
LEXICON Adjectives
    nalla      Adj_Infl ;   ! good
    valiya     Adj_Infl ;   ! big
    cheriya    Adj_Infl ;   ! small

! --- 4 verb stems ---
LEXICON Verbs
    kali       V_Infl ;   ! play
    paadi      V_Infl ;   ! sing
    nadakk     V_Infl ;   ! walk
    vaayikk    V_Infl ;   ! read

! --- Noun inflection patterns ---
LEXICON N_Infl
    +N+Sg+Nom:0          # ;   ! base form:        kutti
    +N+Sg+Gen:^inte      # ;   ! singular genitive: kuttiyinte
    +N+Pl+Nom:^kal       # ;   ! plural:            kuttikal
    +N+Pl+Gen:^kalude    # ;   ! plural genitive:   kuttikalude

! --- Adjective inflection patterns ---
LEXICON Adj_Infl
    +Adj+Nom:0           # ;   ! base form: nalla
    +Adj+Pred:^aanu      # ;   ! predicative: nallaanu (is good)
    +Adj+Comp:^kkaal     # ;   ! comparative: nallakkaal (more good)

! --- Verb inflection patterns ---
LEXICON V_Infl
    +V+Pres:^unnu        # ;   ! present: kaliyunnu (is playing)
    +V+Past:^thu         # ;   ! past: kalithu
    +V+Fut:^um           # ;   ! future: kaliyum
